Idaho, session 2025, H0119.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 31, Title 54, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.